Wisconsin, session 2025, SB853.
do enact as follows:SB853,11Section 1. 16.9652 of the statutes is created to read:SB853,2,4216.9652 Climate change planning grants. (1) In this section, “local 3governmental unit” means a county, city, village, town, or regional planning 4commission.SB853,2,125(2) From the appropriation under s. 20.505 (1) (cp), upon application the 6department shall provide grants to local governmental units to finance the cost of 7planning for climate change under ss. 66.1001 (2g), 251.05 (3) (c), and 323.14 (1m). 8A grant under this section shall be in an amount that finances the entire cost 9attributable to the consideration of climate change in a plan under s. 66.1001 (2g), 10251.05 (3) (c), or 323.14 (1m), as determined by the department. The department 11shall prescribe the form, nature, and extent of information that shall be contained 12in applications for grants under this section.SB853,213Section 2. 20.505 (1) (cp) of the statutes is created to read:SB853,2,151420.505 (1) (cp) Climate change planning grants. A sum sufficient to provide 15climate change planning grants to local governmental units under s. 16.9652.SB853,316Section 3. 66.1001 (2g) of the statutes is created to read:SB853,2,201766.1001 (2g) Consideration of climate change. In preparing or updating 18a comprehensive plan, a local governmental unit shall consider, to the extent 19practicable, the effects of climate change with regard to each of the elements under 20sub. (2).SB853,41Section 4. 251.05 (3) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:SB853,3,82251.05 (3) (c) Involve key policymakers and the general public in determining 3and developing a community health improvement plan that includes actions to 4implement the services and functions specified under s. 250.03 (1) (L). The plan 5under this paragraph shall include consideration of the effects of climate change on 6community health and consideration of the policies, plans, and programs that may 7assist in mitigating community health problems and health hazards resulting from 8the effects of climate change.SB853,59Section 5. 323.14 (1m) of the statutes is created to read:SB853,3,1510323.14 (1m) Considerations in federal hazard mitigation planning. If a 11city, village, town, or county develops a mitigation plan under 42 USC 5165, the 12city, village, town, or county shall consider the effects of climate change on the 13natural hazards, risks, and vulnerabilities of the city, village, town, or county and 14consider actions that may assist in mitigating the effects of climate change on these 15hazards, risks, and vulnerabilities.SB853,3,1616